Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.14.330

Decree of dissolution—Other orders, decrees, and injunctions—Revenue clearance certificate.

(1) If after a hearing the court determines that one or more grounds for judicial dissolution described in RCW 23B.14.300 exist, it may enter a decree dissolving the corporation and specifying the effective date of the dissolution, or, with or without ordering dissolution, may make such other orders and decrees and issue such injunctions in the case as justice and equity require.

(2) The court shall not enter or sign any decree of dissolution until it receives a copy of a revenue clearance certificate for the corporation issued pursuant to RCW 82.32.260.

(3) If the court enters a decree of dissolution, the petitioner or moving party shall deliver a certified copy of the decree and a copy of the revenue clearance certificate to the secretary of state, who shall file them. The court shall then direct the winding up and liquidation of the corporation's business and affairs in accordance with RCW 23B.14.050.

[ 1995 c 47 s 4; 1989 c 165 s 166.]